Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.2. Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.
§ 36-55.30.
Powers of HDA generally.

The HDA is hereby granted, has and may exercise all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes, including, without limitation, the following:

Sue and be sued in its own name;

Have an official seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

Have perpetual succession;

Maintain an office at such place or places within the Commonwealth as it may designate;

Adopt and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, not inconsistent with this chapter, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of HDA and the conduct of its business;

Make and execute contracts and all other instruments and agreements necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions;

Acquire real or personal property, or any interest therein, by purchase, exchange, gift, assignment, transfer, foreclosure, lease or otherwise, including rights or easements; to hold, manage, operate, or improve real or personal property; to sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, or any interest therein, or deed of trust or mortgage lien interest owned by it or under its control, custody or in its possession and release or relinquish any right, title, claim, lien, interest, easement or demand however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption in property foreclosed by it and to do any of the foregoing by public or private sale, with or without public bidding, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law;

To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands, buildings, structures or facilities to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

To enter into agreements or other transactions with the federal government, the Commonwealth of Virginia or any governmental agency thereof or any municipality in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the development, maintenance, operation and financing of any housing development or residential housing, or land improvement; to enter into agreements with the federal government or other parties for the provision by the HDA, or any entity or fund owned or sponsored by or related to the HDA, of services and assistance in the restructuring or modification of debt or subsidy, or in the improvement of the financial or physical condition, of any housing development or residential housing, including without limitation any housing development or residential housing owned, financed or assisted by the federal government or financed by a mortgage loan insured by the federal government, which agreements may provide for the indemnification by the HDA of the federal government or other parties against liabilities and costs in connection with the provision of such services and assistance if such indemnification is determined by the executive director to be in furtherance of the public purposes of this chapter, provided that (i) such indemnification shall be payable solely from the funds of the HDA, excluding any funds appropriated by the Commonwealth which shall be held by the HDA in a separate fund while such indemnification is in effect, (ii) such indemnification shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the Commonwealth and the Commonwealth shall not be liable therefor, and (iii) any such agreement limits the HDA’s total liability for the indemnification thereunder to a stated dollar amount and notifies the federal government or other parties that the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth are not pledged or committed to payment of the HDA’s obligation to indemnify the federal government or other parties under such agreement; to operate and administer loan programs of the federal government, the Commonwealth of Virginia, or any governmental agency thereof or any municipality involving land development, the planning, development, construction or rehabilitation of housing developments and residential housing, the acquisition, preservation, improvement or financing of existing residential housing or other forms of housing assistance for persons and families of low and moderate income, however funded; and to operate and administer any program of housing assistance for persons and families of low and moderate income, however funded;

To receive and accept aid, grants, contributions and cooperation of any kind from any source for the purposes of this chapter subject to such conditions, acceptable to HDA, upon which such aid, grants, contributions and cooperation may be made, including, but not limited to, rent supplement payments made on behalf of eligible persons or families or for the payment in whole or in part of the interest expense for a housing development or for any other purpose consistent with this chapter;

To provide, contract or arrange for consolidated processing of any aspect of a housing development in order to avoid duplication thereof by either undertaking the processing in whole or in part for any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of the Commonwealth, or, in the alternative, to delegate the processing in whole or in part to any such department, agency or instrumentality;

To provide advice and technical information, including technical assistance at the state and local levels in the use of both public and private resources to increase low-income housing resources for the disabled;

To employ architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, housing, construction and financial experts and such other advisors, consultants and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;

To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets, including mortgages and mortgage loans, in such amounts and from such insurers as it deems desirable;

To insure mortgage payments of any mortgage loan made for the purpose of constructing, rehabilitating, purchasing, leasing, or refinancing housing developments for persons and families of low and moderate income upon such terms and conditions as HDA may prescribe and to create insurance funds and form corporations for the purpose of providing mortgage guaranty insurance on mortgage loans made or financed by HDA pursuant to this chapter;

To invest its funds as provided in this chapter or permitted by applicable law;

To borrow money and issue bonds and notes or other evidences of indebtedness thereof as hereinafter provided;

Subject to the requirements of any agreements with bondholders or noteholders, to consent to any modification with respect to rate of interest, time and payment of any installment of principal or interest, security or any other term of any contract, mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract or agreement of any kind to which HDA is a party;

Subject to the requirements of any agreements with bondholders or noteholders, to enter into contracts with any mortgagor containing provisions enabling such mortgagor to reduce the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges where, by reason of other income or payment from any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States or the Commonwealth, such reductions can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of housing being financed;

To procure or agree to the procurement of insurance or guarantees from the federal government of the payment of any bonds or notes or any other evidences of indebtedness thereof issued by HDA or an authority, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements with mortgage lenders for the servicing and processing of mortgage loans pursuant to this chapter;

To establish, and revise from time to time and charge and collect fees and charges in connection with any agreements made by HDA under this chapter;

To do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers herein granted or reasonably implied;

To invest in, purchase or make commitments to purchase securities or other obligations secured by or payable from mortgage loans on, or issued for the purpose of financing or otherwise assisting land development or residential housing for persons or families of low or moderate income;

To acquire, develop and own multifamily residential housing as hereinafter provided;

To enter into agreements with owners of housing developments eligible for federal low-income housing credits as hereinafter provided in this chapter;

To exercise any of the powers granted by this chapter for the purpose of financing an economically mixed project and, if such project is within a revitalization area designated in or pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

, any nonhousing buildings that are incidental to such project or are determined by such governing body to be necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such area or for the industrial, commercial, or other economic development of such area; provided that a capital reserve fund shall not be created for any such financing pursuant to §

36-55.41

;

To make and enter into contracts and agreements to act as the loan servicer for a housing lender on properties located in or outside of the Commonwealth to persons and families of any income; and

To indemnify other parties against liabilities, obligations, losses, payments, damages, expenses, and costs as may be necessary or appropriate to the exercise of any power herein granted or reasonably implied, provided that (i) such indemnification shall be payable solely from the funds of the HDA and (ii) such indemnification shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the Commonwealth, and the Commonwealth shall not be liable therefor.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1979, c. 613; 1986, c. 6; 1987, c. 254; 1990, c. 956; 1996, c. 498; 1998, c. 442; 2004, c. 187; 2011, c. 690; 2012, c. 238.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 482, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority be requested to study ways to incentivize the development of affordable housing in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“In conducting its study, the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority shall convene a stakeholder advisory group consisting of individuals with expertise in land development, construction, affordable housing, real estate finance, tax credit syndication, and other areas of expertise as determined by the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority, and at least one resident of an affordable housing property. Such advisory group shall (i) determine the quantity and quality of affordable housing and workforce housing across the Commonwealth, (ii) conduct a review of current programs and policies to determine the effectiveness of current housing policy efforts, (iii) develop an informed projection of future housing needs in the Commonwealth and determine the order of priority of those needs, and (iv) make recommendations for the improvement of housing policy in the Commonwealth.

“The advisory group shall consider the following proposals as well as other proposals it considers advisable during the course of its analysis and deliberations: (a) a Virginia rent subsidy program to work in conjunction with the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, (b) utility rate reduction for qualified affordable housing, (c) real property tax reduction for qualified affordable housing for localities that desire to provide such an incentive, (d) bond financing options for qualified affordable housing, and (e) existing programs to increase the supply of qualified affordable housing.

“All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority for this study, upon request.

“The Department of Housing and Community Development and the Virginia Housing and Development Authority shall complete its meetings by November 30, 2020, and shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an executive summary and a report of the findings and recommendations of the stakeholder advisory group for publication as a House or Senate document. The executive summary and report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports no later than the first day of the 2021 Regular Session of the General Assembly and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.”

Acts 2020, c. 517, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Housing and Community Development (the Department) and the Virginia Housing Development Authority (the Authority) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group to develop draft legislation establishing a Virginia housing opportunity tax credit program for the purpose of providing incentives for the utilization of private equity in the development and construction of affordable housing in the Commonwealth and regulations for implementing such program. The stakeholder advisory group shall also conduct financial modeling to determine the fiscal impact to the Commonwealth of various levels of funding for a Virginia housing opportunity tax credit. The stakeholder advisory group shall determine the most effective and efficient way to administer the program in conjunction with the federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program.

“§ 2. The stakeholder advisory group shall consist of individuals with expertise in land development, construction, affordable housing, real-estate finance, tax credit syndication, the federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program, or other areas of expertise as determined by the Department and the Authority. The stakeholder advisory group shall also include representatives from the Department and the Authority.

“§ 3. The stakeholder advisory group shall receive support from the staff of the Department and the Authority.

“§ 4. The stakeholder advisory group shall report its recommendations to the Governor, the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the commissioners of the Virginia Housing Development Authority by September 1, 2020.”

The 1996 amendment

deleted “and” at the end of subdivision 25, inserted “and” at the end of subdivision 26, and added subdivision 27.

The 1998 amendment,

in subdivision 9, inserted the language beginning “to enter into agreements” and ending “or other parties under such agreement.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 substituted “multifamily” for “multi-family” in subdivision 26; and rewrote subdivision 27, which formerly read: “To exercise any of the powers granted by this chapter for the purpose of developing an economically mixed project or proposed development located within a locally designated conservation, rehabilitation, redevelopment or housing rehabilitation district.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 690, in subdivisions 4, 11, and 19, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth”; and added subdivision 28 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 238 added subdivision 29 and made related changes.

§ 36-55.30:1.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 374.

Editor’s note.

Repealed §

36-55.30:1

was derived from Acts 1978, c. 508.

§ 36-55.30:2.
Housing revitalization areas; economically mixed projects.

For the sole purpose of empowering the HDA to provide financing in accordance with this chapter, the governing body of any city or county may by resolution designate an area within such city or county as a revitalization area if such governing body shall in such resolution make the following determinations with respect to such area: (i) either (a) the area is blighted, deteriorated, deteriorating or, if not rehabilitated, likely to deteriorate by reason that the buildings, improvements or other facilities in such area are subject to one or more of the following conditions: dilapidation; obsolescence; overcrowding; inadequate ventilation, light or sanitation; excessive land coverage; deleterious land use; or faulty or inadequate design, quality or condition; or (b) the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such area will benefit the city or county but such area lacks the housing needed to induce manufacturing, industrial, commercial, governmental, educational, entertainment, community development, healthcare or nonprofit enterprises or undertakings to locate or remain in such area; and (ii) private enterprise and investment are not reasonably expected, without assistance, to produce the construction or rehabilitation of decent, safe and sanitary housing and supporting facilities that will meet the needs of low and moderate income persons and families in such area and will induce other persons and families to live within such area and thereby create a desirable economic mix of residents in such area. Any redevelopment area, conservation area, or rehabilitation area created or designated by the city or county pursuant to Chapter 1 (§

36-1

et seq.) of this title, any census tract in which 70 percent or more of the families have incomes which are 80 percent or less of the statewide median income as determined by the federal government pursuant to Section 143 of the United States Internal Revenue Code or any successor code provision on the basis of the most recent decennial census for which data are available, and any census tract which is designated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and, for the most recent year for which census data are available on household income in such tract, either in which 50 percent or more of the households have an income which is less than 60 percent of the area median gross income for such year or which has a poverty rate of at least 25 percent shall be deemed to be designated as a revitalization area without adoption of the above described resolution of the city or county. In any revitalization area, the HDA may provide financing for one or more economically mixed projects and, in conjunction therewith, any nonhousing buildings that are incidental to such project or projects or are determined by the governing body of the city or county to be necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such area or for the industrial, commercial or other economic development thereof.

The HDA may finance an economically mixed project that is not within a revitalization area if the governing body of the city or county in which such project is or will be located shall by resolution determine (i) either (a) that the ability to provide residential housing and supporting facilities that serve persons or families of lower or moderate income will be enhanced if a portion of the units therein are occupied or held available for occupancy by persons and families who are not of low and moderate income or (b) that the surrounding area of such project is, or is expected in the future to be, inhabited predominantly by lower income persons and families and will benefit from an economic mix of residents in such project and (ii) private enterprise and investment are not reasonably expected, without assistance, to produce the construction or rehabilitation of decent, safe and sanitary housing and supporting facilities that will meet the needs of low and moderate income persons and families in such area and will induce other persons and families to live within such area and thereby create a desirable economic mix of residents in such area.

In any economically mixed project financed under this section, the percentage of units occupied or held available for occupancy by persons and families who are not of low and moderate income, as determined as of the date of their initial occupancy of such units, shall not exceed 80 percent.

History.

1979, c. 374; 1996, cc. 77, 498; 2004, c. 187; 2006, c. 784.

Cross references.

As to creation of local housing revitalization zones, see Chapter 11 (§

36-157

et seq.) of Title 36.

Editor’s note.

For Section 143 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, referred to above, see 26
U.S.C.S. § 143.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendment by c. 77 substituted “savings institutions” for “savings and loan associations” near the middle of the former first sentence of subsection (c).

The 1996 amendment by c. 498, in subsection (a), deleted “it appears to the governing body of any city that” following “Whenever,” substituted “the governing body of such city or county may by resolution” for “such governing body may by resolution,” and inserted “or county” at the end of the subsection, in subsection (b), deleted “within or without a housing rehabilitation district, if any” following “a proposed housing project,” substituted “by providing housing and other facilities for other persons and families” for “only by effectively subsidizing the rentals of such persons and families through higher rentals charged to other persons or that, for any other reason, such proposed project is feasible only if a portion,” and substituted “of the total project” for “thereof is to be rented to persons other than persons and families of low and moderate income” following “eighty percent,” in subsection (c), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “Any such governing body shall appoint a board of five persons, all of whom shall be residents of the city and at least four of whom shall be representatives of savings and loan associations, commercial banks and mortgage bankers, which shall evaluate the ability of private enterprise and investment, without assistance, to meet the needs of persons and families of low and moderate income within any proposed housing rehabilitation district and to induce other persons to live within such proposed district,” in the present first sentence, substituted “by a governing body unless” for “by the governing body of any city unless,” substituted “governing body” for “board,” substituted “to meet the” for “to meet such,” inserted “of persons and families of low and moderate income within the district” following “housing needs,” deleted “producing rentals” following “at interest rates,” and inserted “will result in rents or prices” following “which,” substituted the present second sentence for the former third sentence, which read: “Unless the board shall reaffirm its determination after four years from the date of its previous determination, then the status of any area as a housing rehabilitation district shall terminate on the fifth anniversary of such previous determination,” and deleted former subsection (d), which read: “No housing rehabilitation district shall be created, nor any proposed project declared an economically mixed project, by the governing body of any city, except a city having (i) no fewer than 110,000 nor more than 111,000 inhabitants according to the 1970 federal census and (ii) at least seven per centum of all residential housing units located within such city receiving rental or mortgage interest subsidization from other than private sources.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 rewrote the section.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 784, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “Any redevelopment area, conservation area, or rehabilitation area created or designated” for “The area within a redevelopment project, conservation project, or rehabilitation district established.”

§ 36-55.30:3.
Regulations; adoption procedures.

The HDA shall have the power to adopt, amend and repeal regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter or other applicable laws, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the HDA and the conduct of its business. Such regulations shall be designed to effectuate the general purposes of this chapter.

The full text or an informative summary of any proposed new regulation, or any amendment to or repeal of a regulation shall be published not less than fifteen nor more than thirty days before the same may be acted upon and shall state the time and place of a public hearing at which the matters mentioned therein will be considered, at which time any person wishing to comment shall be heard and any written comments shall be considered. Such publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation published in Richmond and in addition, as HDA may determine, it may be similarly published in newspapers in localities particularly affected as well as publicized through press releases and other media as will best serve the purpose and subject involved.

If HDA is satisfied that the proposed regulation or amendments thereto or repeal thereof, or any part thereof, in the form in which it was proposed or changed as a result of such public hearing, provided the changes do not alter the main purpose of the regulation, is advisable, such regulation, amendment to or repeal of a regulation, or any part thereof, may be adopted and, if adopted, shall be published as prescribed in subsection B of this section and shall state the date when it is to become effective.

History.

1979, c. 613; 1988, c. 364.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the act having been

36-55.30:2

.

§ 36-55.31.
Powers relative to making mortgage loans and temporary construction loans to housing sponsors and persons and families of low and moderate income.

The HDA shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

through (3) [Repealed.]

(4)

Enter into agreements and contracts with housing sponsors under the provisions of this section;

(5)

Institute any action or proceeding against any housing sponsor or persons and families of low or moderate income receiving a loan under the provisions hereof, or owning any housing development hereunder in any court of competent jurisdiction in order to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the terms and provisions of any agreement or contract between HDA and such recipients of loans under the provisions hereof, including without limitation provisions as to rental or carrying charges and income limits as applied to tenants or occupants, or to foreclose its mortgage, or to protect the public interest, persons and families of low and moderate income, stockholders, or creditors of such sponsor. In connection with any such action or proceeding it may apply for the appointment of a trustee or receiver to take over, manage, operate and maintain the affairs of a housing sponsor and HDA through such agent as it shall designate is hereby authorized to accept appointment as trustee or receiver of any such sponsor when so appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction.The reorganization of any housing sponsor shall be subject to the supervision and control of HDA, and no such reorganization shall be had without the consent of HDA. Upon any such reorganization the amount of capitalization, including therein all stocks, income debentures and bonds and other evidence of indebtedness shall be such as is authorized by HDA, but not in excess of the fair value of the property received;

(6)

In any foreclosure action involving a housing sponsor other than a foreclosure action instituted by HDA, the municipality in which any housing development is situate shall, in addition to other necessary parties, be made parties defendant. HDA and the municipality shall take all steps in such action necessary to protect the interest of the public therein, and no costs shall be awarded against HDA or the municipality.Subject to the terms of any applicable agreement, contract or other instrument entered into or obtained pursuant to this chapter, judgment of foreclosure shall not be entered unless the court to which application therefor is made shall be satisfied that the interest of the lienholders or holders of bonds or other obligations cannot be adequately secured or safeguarded except by the sale of the property; and in such proceeding the court shall be authorized to make an order increasing the rental or carrying charges to be charged for the housing accommodations in the housing development involved in such foreclosure, or appoint a member of HDA or any officer of the municipality, as a receiver or trustee of the property, or grant such other and further relief as may be reasonable and proper; and in the event of a foreclosure or other judicial sale, the property shall be sold only to a housing sponsor which will manage, operate and maintain the housing development subject to the provisions of this chapter, unless the court shall find that the interest and principal on the obligations secured by the lien which is the subject of foreclosure cannot be earned under the limitations imposed by the provisions of this chapter and that the proceeding was brought in good faith, in which event the property may be sold free of limitations imposed by this chapter or subject to such limitations as the court may deem advisable to protect the public interest;

(7)

In the event of a judgment against any housing sponsor in any action not pertaining to the foreclosure of a mortgage, there shall be no sale of any of the real property included in any housing development hereunder of such housing sponsor except upon 60 days’ written notice to HDA. Upon receipt of such notice HDA shall take such steps as in its judgment may be necessary to protect the rights of all parties;

(8)

In the event of violation by a housing sponsor of any provision of a loan, the terms of any agreement between HDA and the housing sponsor, the provisions of this chapter or of any rules or regulations duly promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, HDA may remove any or all of the existing directors or officers of such corporate housing sponsor and may appoint such person or persons who HDA in its sole discretion deems advisable as new directors or officers to serve in the places of those removed notwithstanding the provisions of any other law and may designate a managing agent with complete and exclusive power to act on behalf of a defaulting partnership housing sponsor; provided, however, that any such directors or officers or managing agents so appointed by HDA shall serve only for a period coexistent with the duration of such violation or until HDA is assured in a manner satisfactory to it against violations of a similar nature or both. Officers or directors so appointed need not be stockholders or meet other qualifications which may be prescribed by the certificate of incorporation or by other laws governing such qualified housing sponsor;

(9)

Foreclose under deeds of trust by powers of sale pursuant to Title 55.1 and amendments thereto;

(10)

Make, undertake commitments to make and participate in the making of mortgage loans, including without limitation federally insured mortgage loans, to housing sponsors to finance the ownership and operation of housing developments and multifamily residential housing intended for occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income, upon the terms and conditions set forth in subsections A and B of §

36-55.33:1

;

(11)

Make, undertake commitments to make and participate in the making of mortgage loans, including without limitation federally insured mortgage loans, to persons and families of low and moderate income to finance the purchase or refinancing of single-family residential housing, upon the terms and conditions set forth in subsections A and C of §

36-55.33:1

;

(12)

Make, undertake commitments to make and participate in the making of mortgage loans, including without limitation federally insured mortgage loans, to housing sponsors and persons and families of low and moderate income to finance the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement of housing developments and residential housing intended, upon completion of such construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement, for ownership or occupancy by persons and families of low and moderate income, upon the terms and conditions set forth in subsections A and D of §

36-55.33:1

;

(13)

Make, undertake commitments to make and participate in the making of mortgage loans to finance the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement, or ownership and operation, of economically mixed projects and, if any such project is within a revitalization area designated in or pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

, any nonhousing buildings that are incidental to such project or are determined by such governing body to be necessary or appropriate for the revitalization of such area or for the industrial, commercial or other economic development of such area, upon the terms and conditions set forth in subsections A and E of §

36-55.33:1

.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1979, c. 374; 2004, c. 187.

Cross references.

As to laws exempt from the contract rate of interest, see §

6.2-303

.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted
“Title 55.1” for “Title 55.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 187 substituted “60” for “sixty” in the first sentence of subdivision (7); substituted “multifamily” for “multi-family” in subdivision (10); and rewrote subdivision (13), which formerly read: “Make, undertake commitments to make and participate in the making of mortgage loans to finance the construction, rehabilitation, preservation or improvement of housing units within housing rehabilitation districts or of economically mixed projects within or without a housing rehabilitation district, if any.”

§ 36-55.31:1.
Loans for installation of certain energy-saving devices.

The Virginia Housing Development Authority shall establish a program of loans for financing the purchase and installation of insulation, storm windows and doors and solar or other alternative energy sources which will reduce the reliance on present sources of energy for use in the dwellings of residents of the Commonwealth or public or nonprofit buildings or facilities. Any and all funds available through specific state appropriations or federal grants or other state or federal assistance for such purposes may be utilized by the Virginia Housing Development Authority. Any loan made pursuant to this section may be secured by a mortgage or otherwise or may be unsecured, shall be repaid, shall bear interest and shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by HDA in its rules and regulations or in the HDA resolution, or commitment for, such loan. Any such loans made with respect to dwellings of residents of the Commonwealth shall be limited to dwellings occupied by persons or families of low and moderate income. The Commissioners of the Virginia Housing Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations for the orderly administration of this section.

History.

1977, c. 431; 1978, c. 631.

§ 36-55.32.
Powers relative to purchase and sale to mortgage lenders of mortgage loans; loans to mortgage lenders.

The HDA shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

To invest in, purchase or to make commitments to purchase, and take assignments from mortgage lenders, of notes and mortgages evidencing loans for the construction, rehabilitation, purchase, leasing or refinancing of residential housing for persons and families of low and moderate income in this Commonwealth upon the terms set forth in §

36-55.35

;

To make loans to mortgage lenders under terms and conditions requiring the proceeds thereof to be used by such mortgage lenders for the making of new residential mortgage loans to finance multi-family or single-family residential housing for persons and families of low and moderate income, upon the terms set forth in §

36-55.35

;

To make commitments to purchase, and to purchase, service and sell mortgages insured by any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States, and to make loans directly upon the security of any such mortgage, provided the underlying mortgage loans shall have been made and shall be continued to be used solely to finance or refinance the construction, rehabilitation, purchase or leasing of residential housing for persons and families of low and moderate income in this Commonwealth;

To sell, at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, any mortgage or other obligation held by HDA;

To enter into mortgage insurance agreements with mortgage lenders in connection with the lending of money by such institutions to persons and families of low and moderate income for the purchase of residential housing;

Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, to collect, enforce the collection of, and foreclose on any collateral securing its loans to mortgage lenders and acquire or take possession of such collateral and sell the same at public or private sale, with or without public bidding, and otherwise deal with such collateral as may be necessary to protect the interests of HDA therein.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1982, c. 152.

§ 36-55.33.
Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 536.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1975, c. 536, cl. 2 provides: “That nothing in this act shall impair the obligation of the Virginia Housing Development Authority with respect to any bonds, notes or other obligations outstanding on the effective date of this act [March 22, 1975].”